California statutes. Military and Veterans Code
325.

When an officer or enlisted person of the United States Army, United States Navy, or United States Air Force, detailed by the Department of the Army, the Department of the Navy, or the Department of the Air Force for service with the National Guard or Naval Militia, is detailed by the Governor for special duty or requested to perform any duty involving travel not specially directed by the Department of the Army, the Department of the Navy, or the Department of the Air Force, the officer or enlisted person shall be allowed their actual traveling expenses, but no per diem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 25.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

326.

Commissioned officers, warrant officers and enlisted persons and former commissioned officers, warrant officers and enlisted persons of the United States Army, United States Air Force, United States Navy, or any reserve component thereof, California National Guard, State Guard, California National Guard Reserve, California Defense and Security Corps, California State Guard, California Reserve and Retired List or the active militia, may, with their
 consent, be detailed for active duty with a security section which the Adjutant General is hereby authorized to maintain in the Adjutant General’s office. A commissioned officer, warrant officer or enlisted person who is detailed for duty as provided in this section may be paid compensation in any grade or rank lower than the person actually holds provided the commissioned officer, warrant officer or enlisted person voluntarily waives all compensation in excess of the lower grade or rank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 19.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

327.

Officers, warrant officers, and enlisted persons on active duty in the service of the state shall be eligible for health care benefits 30 days after being called to active duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 28.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

328.

(a) The purpose of this section is to help defray the uniform and travel costs paid by volunteers in the State Guard and Naval Militia.

(b) On January 1, 2007, the amount of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the Military Department for the purposes of providing a combined uniform and travel allowance to each volunteer member of the
 State Guard
 or Naval Militia, on or before the last day of the month following the volunteer member’s completion of one year of satisfactory service in the State Guard or Naval Militia, and annually thereafter following the completion of any subsequent full year of satisfactory service.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “satisfactory service” shall consist of 100 percent constructive attendance at training assemblies or as otherwise defined by Military Department regulations.

(d) The amount of the allowance shall be one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 20.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

329.

The Military Department Workers’ Compensation Fund is hereby created within the State Treasury. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the Military Department for purposes of subdivision (a).

(a) The moneys in the fund shall be expended for workers’ compensation claims that are wholly or partially reimbursed by the federal government for personnel within the Military Department.

(b) The fund may receive and deposit any moneys received from the federal government for the sole purpose of paying workers’ compensation claims of current employees or service members.

(c) Moneys
 in the fund may only be expended by the Military Department for workers’ compensation claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 17, Sec. 24.   (AB 103)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Organization Allowances [330. - 333.]

330.

The commanding officers of the several companies, troops, batteries, squadrons, headquarters or detachments shall submit vouchers or claims for necessary expenses including armory rental, janitor service, clerical service, recruiting, care of arms and equipment, and other incidental expenses. Expenses incurred for these purposes shall upon the approval of the Adjutant General constitute valid claims against appropriations for military purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 330.)
-------------------------------------------

333.

No claim shall be allowed under this article except upon vendors’ invoices or demand made quarterly in duplicate, signed and sworn to by the officer claiming the same, before any officer of the National Guard or Naval Militia, or notary public, and forwarded through the headquarters of the regiment, coast artillery corps, separate battalion, or next higher unit, or separate squadron, with the approval of each commanding officer through whose headquarters they are required to pass, direct to The Adjutant General.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1183.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Casualty Insurance [340. - 342.]

340.

(a) Subject to Section 340.1, whenever any officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member of the California National Guard, the organized militia, or the unorganized militia, when called into the active service of the state, pursuant to Section 142, 143, or 146, is wounded, injured, disabled, or killed in the active service of the state in the line of duty, the member or the member’s dependents shall receive compensation under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3201) of the Labor Code. For these purposes, the member is deemed to be an employee of the state. The compensation shall be based on the member’s average income from all sources during the year immediately preceding the date of wounding, injury, death, or the commencement of disability and shall not exceed the maximum prescribed in Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code.

(b) For the purposes of this article, any officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member performing military duty of any nature pursuant to Title 32 or Title 10 of the United States Code shall not be entitled to benefits described in subdivision (a) or in Section 340.1.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member on full-time active duty with the Office of the Adjutant General who suffers disability or death in the line of duty from either injury or disease is entitled to receive, from the state, benefits or compensation for that disability or death comparable to that provided to members of the United States armed forces on active duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 496.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

340.1.

(a) Any officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member of the California National Guard, the organized militia, or the unorganized militia, when called into the active service of the state, pursuant to Sections 142, 143, or 146, except an officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member on full-time duty with the Office of the Adjutant General, who is wounded, injured, or disabled in the active service of the state in the line of duty shall be retained on active duty and shall receive regular military pay and allowances for not to exceed 52 weeks from the date of wounding, injury, or disability, regardless of the date of expiration of the period of state active duty, unless any of the following occurs:

(1) The member becomes entitled to disability compensation through any private or other public employer.

(2) The member is able to return to their regular civilian employment, as determined by proper authority.

(3) The member requests an earlier release from active duty.

(b) A member who has received benefits under subdivision (a) and who is unable to return to their regular civilian employment following 52 weeks after the date of wounding, injury, or disability is entitled to compensation under Division 4 (commencing with Section 3201) of the Labor Code, pursuant to Section 340.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 26.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

340.2.

Any officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member of the California National Guard, the organized militia, or the unorganized militia, when called into the active service of the state, pursuant to Sections 142, 143, or 146, who, while in that active service, is transferred by the California National Guard or other military authority to any other state or local agency for purposes of fulfilling active service requirements pursuant to either a mutual aid agreement or an interagency agreement and is wounded, injured, or disabled in the line of duty, is entitled to the benefits provided under Section 340.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 287, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

341.

In the determination of the benefits to be awarded any member of the militia or his dependents under the provisions of Section 340, it shall be conclusively presumed that the average yearly earning of such injured or deceased member is not less than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). Any injury, death, or disability shall be deemed to have been suffered in line of duty unless the same resulted from misconduct or disobedience of lawful orders by the injured or deceased member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1952, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

342.

The appeals board is empowered to hear and determine all issues concerning any obligation of the State of California to provide to any officer, warrant officer, or enlisted person on active duty with the Office of the Adjutant General any rights or benefits provided in Section 3, Public Law 108, Chapter 225, 81st Congress, First Session, and any and all issues arising under or in connection with that law. In doing so, the appeals board shall follow the same procedures in all respects as are provided in Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code for the determination of workers’ compensation claims. The orders, decisions, and awards of the appeals board issued in exercising this jurisdiction are subject to review and rehearing in the manner provided in Sections 5900 to 5956, inclusive, of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 29.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. State Militia Disability Equality Act [345. - 346.]

345.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the State Militia Disability Equality Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 319, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

346.

(a) When any officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member of the California National Guard or the organized militia who is not in active service in this state is wounded, injured, or disabled in the line of duty when performing military duty of any nature under Title 10 or Title 32 of the United States Code, the Military Department shall determine both of the following amounts:

(1) The amount of disability benefits to which a member of the United States Armed Forces of the same or equivalent rank would be entitled from the federal government as a result of a comparable wound, injury, or disability.

(2) The amount of disability benefits to which the officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member is entitled from the federal government as a result of the wound, injury, or disability.

(b) If the Military Department determines that the amount described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) is greater than the amount described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), that department shall, upon an appropriation of funds to the department by the Legislature for this purpose, provide to the officer, warrant officer, or enlisted member an amount equal to the difference between those two amounts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 319, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Discipline and Exercise [360. - 375.]

360.

The system of discipline and exercise of the National Guard, unorganized militia when called into the service of the State, and the Naval Militia shall conform generally to that of the Army of the United States, the United States Navy and the United States Air Force, and to the provisions of the laws of the United States, except as otherwise provided in this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

361.

All matters relating to the organization, discipline, and government of the National Guard, the unorganized militia when called into the service of the State, and Naval Militia not otherwise provided for in this code or in the general regulations, shall be decided by the custom and usage of the United States Army, United States Air Force and United States Navy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 612.)
-------------------------------------------

362.

All commanding officers shall be responsible to their immediate commanders for the equipment, drill, instruction, movements, and efficiency of their respective commands.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

363.

Every officer and enlisted person shall be responsible to the officer under whose immediate command they serve for prompt and unhesitating obedience to lawful orders, faithful performance of duty, and the preservation and proper use of the property in their possession that belongs to the United States, the State of California, or the appropriate military organization. Each officer and enlisted person shall at all times, without equivocation, obey the lawful orders of their superior officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 27.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

364.

Any officer or enlisted person of the National Guard or Naval Militia who willfully fails to attend any parade or encampment, or who neglects or refuses to obey the lawful command of their superior officer on any day of parade or encampment, or who fails to perform any military duty that may be lawfully required of them, or who uses disrespectful language toward their superior officer or commits any act of insubordination, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 28.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

365.

When an armed force is called out for the purpose of suppressing an unlawful or riotous assembly, or arresting the offenders, or in any emergency or under the provisions of Sections 128, 143, or 146 of this code, and is placed under the temporary direction of any civil officer, it shall obey the orders of such civil officer which extend only to the direction of the general or specific object to be accomplished. The tactical direction of the troops, the kind and extent of force to be used, and the particular means to be employed to accomplish the object specified by the civil officer are left solely to the commanding officer of the active militia on duty or to the commanding officer of the unorganized militia called to the service of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 393.)
-------------------------------------------

366.

Whenever any portion of the National Guard, or of the unorganized militia when called into the service of the State, or Naval Militia is called into active service to suppress an insurrection or rebellion, to disperse a mob, or in an emergency or in any of the cases provided for in Sections 128, 143, or 146 of this code, or to enforce the execution of the laws of the State or of the United States, the commanding officer shall use his own discretion with respect to the propriety of attacking or firing upon any mob or unlawful assembly, or of attacking or using fire power in the military situation present. His honest and reasonable judgment in the exercise of his duty shall be full protection, civilly and criminally, for any act or acts done while on duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1947, Ch. 155.)
-------------------------------------------

367.

No officer who is called out to sustain the civil authorities shall, under any pretense, or in compliance with any order, fire blank cartridges upon any mob or unlawful assemblage, under penalty of being dismissed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

368.

(a) Each company, troop, squadron, battery, detachment, and unit shall assemble for drill and instruction, including indoor target practice, not less than forty-eight times each year unless excused by the Governor or other competent authority, and shall in addition thereto participate in encampments, maneuvers, or other exercises, including outdoor target practice, for at least fifteen consecutive days in each year unless excused by competent authority.

(b) In addition to the drills and periods of duty specified in subdivision (a), the commanding officer of any unit may require the officers and enlisted persons of their
 command to meet for parade, drill, and instruction at the times and places as they may appoint.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 29.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

369.

No parade or drill of the active militia shall be ordered in time of peace for any day during which any general election is held, nor shall any organization of the active militia drill or parade on the day during which an election is held at the place where the organization is stationed, except in cases of riot, invasion, insurrection, or imminent danger thereof, or in cases of public calamity or catastrophe.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 536.)
-------------------------------------------

370.

Orders for duty may be oral, written, or by publication.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

371.

Warning for duty may be given by any officer or noncommissioned officer or any other person authorized so to do.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

372.

Officers and enlisted persons may be warned for duty by stating the substance of the order, by reading the order to the person warned, by delivering a copy of the order to that person, by leaving a copy of the order at the last known place of abode or business of that person with some person of the age of discretion, or by sending a copy of the order or its substance to that person by registered mail directed to the enlisted person at his or her last known place of abode or business or to the post office nearest thereto.

In addition to or in lieu of the foregoing, notice may be given by posting a copy of the order at the entrance to the nearest post office to the military or naval headquarters issuing the order, at the entrances of the city hall or county courthouse of the city or county where the headquarters are located, and by causing a copy of the warning order to be published in a newspaper of general circulation in that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 33.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

373.

The person giving the warning for duty shall make a return thereof containing the names of the persons warned and the time, place, and the manner of the warning. The return shall be verified by his oath. Such verified return shall be as good evidence of the facts therein stated on the trial of any person returned as a delinquent as if the person making such return were present and testified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

374.

Every commanding officer shall report to The Adjutant General the name of every delinquent together with a full report of any extenuating circumstances.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 389.)
-------------------------------------------

375.

Officers and enlisted persons of the active militia not in the service of the United States shall be subject to and governed by this code while outside this state under the order or authorization of the Governor under Section 142 in like manner and to the same extent as when on duty within this state under orders of the Governor. Military courts may be convened and held outside the state with the same jurisdiction and power of punishment as if held within the state. Offenses and delinquencies committed outside the state may be tried and punished either within or without the state after the termination of the duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 34.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Privileges and Penalties [389. - 399.5.]

389.

(a) As used in this chapter, “temporary military leave of absence” means a leave of absence from public employment to engage in ordered military duty for a period which by the order is not to exceed 180 calendar days including travel time for purposes of active military training, encampment, naval cruises, special exercises or like activity as a member of the reserve corps or force of the armed forces of the United States, or the National Guard, or the Naval Militia.

(b) “Public employee” means any officer or employee of a public agency, except for those officers or employees of the state subject to the provisions of Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 19770) of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) “Public agency” means the state, or any county, city and county, city, municipal corporation, school district, irrigation district, water district, or other district.

(d) “Armed forces” or “armed forces of the United States” means the “armed forces” as defined in Section 18540 of the Government Code.

(e) “Recognized military service” means service as defined in Section 18540.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 174.)
-------------------------------------------

390.

No person belonging to or on duty with the active militia of the state, or engaged in the performance of military duty on call of the Governor or in pursuance of an order of the President of the United States shall be arrested on any civil process while going to, remaining at, or returning from any place at which he may be required to attend for military duty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1188.)
-------------------------------------------

391.

Every member of the active militia, on active military orders, shall be exempt from road tax and head tax of every description, from jury duty, including service on coroners’ juries, and from service on any posse comitatus, if the member furnishes a copy of their active military orders or a letter from their immediate commanding officer or the Office of the Staff Judge Advocate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 31.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

392.

(a) Members of the militia in the active service of the state shall not be liable civilly or criminally for any act or acts done by them in the performance of their duty.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any act or acts by members of the militia in the active service of the state done by them outside the performance of their military duty, including, but not limited to, sexual assault, as defined in Section 470.5, and sexual harassment, as defined in Section 475.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 183, Sec. 3.   (SB 352)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

393.

(a) In an action or proceeding of any nature commenced in any court against an active member of the militia or a member of the militia in active service in pursuance of an order of the President of the United States as a result of a state emergency for an act done by such member in an official capacity in the discharge of duty, or an alleged omission to do an act which it was the member’s duty to perform, or against any person acting under the authority or order of an officer or by virtue of a warrant issued by an officer pursuant to law:

(1) The defendant in all cases may make a general denial and give special matter in evidence.

(2) A defendant in whose favor a final judgment is rendered in any such action or proceeding shall recover treble costs.

(b) The Attorney General shall defend such active member or person where the action or proceeding is civil. The senior judge advocate on the state staff or one of the judge advocates shall defend such active member or person where the action or proceeding is criminal, and the Adjutant General shall designate the senior judge advocate on the state staff, or one of the judge advocates, to defend such active member or person.

(c) In the event such active member or person is not indemnified by the federal government, Section 825 of the Government Code shall apply to such active member or person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 114.)
-------------------------------------------

394.

(a) A person shall not discriminate against a member of the military or naval forces of the state or of the United States because of that membership. A member of the military forces shall not be prejudiced or injured by a person, employer, or officer or agent of a corporation, company, or firm in terms, conditions, or privileges with respect to that member’s employment, position or status or be denied or disqualified for employment by virtue of membership or service in the military forces of this state or of the United States.

(b) An officer or employee of the state, or of any county, city and county, municipal corporation, or district shall not discriminate against a member of the military or naval forces of the state or of the United States because of that
 membership. A member of the military forces shall not be prejudiced or injured by an officer or employee of the state, or of any county, city and county, municipal corporation, or district in terms, conditions, or privileges with respect to that member’s employment, appointment, position, or status or be denied or disqualified for or discharged from that employment or position by virtue of membership or service in the military forces of this state or of the United States.

(c) A person shall not prohibit or refuse entrance to a member of the Armed Forces of the United States or of the military or naval forces of this state into any public entertainment or place of amusement or into any of the places described in Sections 51 and 52 of the Civil Code because that member wears the uniform of the organization to which
 the member belongs.

(d) An employer or officer or agent of a corporation, company, or firm, or other person, shall not discharge a person from employment because of the performance of any ordered military duty or training or by reason of being a member of the military or naval forces of this state or of the federal reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States, or hinder or prevent that person from performing any military service or from attending any military encampment or place of drill or instruction the person may be called upon to perform or attend by proper authority; prejudice or harm
 the person
 in any manner in the person’s terms, conditions, or privileges of employment, position, or status by reason of performance of military service or duty or attendance at military encampments or places of drill or instruction; or dissuade, prevent, or stop any person from enlistment or accepting a warrant or commission in the California National Guard, State Guard, or Naval Militia or the federal reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States by threat or injury to the person in respect to the person’s terms, conditions, or privileges of employment, position, status, trade, or business because of enlistment or acceptance of a warrant or commission.

(e) (1) A private employer or officer or agent of a corporation, company, or firm, or
 other person, shall not restrict or terminate any collateral benefit for employees by reason of an employee’s temporary incapacitation incident to duty in the National Guard, State Guard, or Naval Militia or the federal reserve components of the Armed Forces of the United States. As used in this subdivision, “temporary incapacitation” means any period of incapacitation of 52 weeks or less.

(2) As used in this subdivision, “benefit” includes, but is not limited to, health care which may be continued at the employee’s expense, life insurance, disability insurance, and seniority status.

(f) A person who provides lending or financing shall not discriminate against a person
 with respect to the terms of a loan or financing, including, but not limited to, the finance charge, based on that person’s membership in the military or naval forces of this state or of the United States. With respect to a loan or credit transaction covered by Section 987 of Title 10 of the United States Code, as amended by 126 Stat. 1785 (Public Law 112-239), and Part 232 (commencing with Section 232.1) of Subchapter M of Chapter I of Subtitle A of Title 32 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended as published on July 22, 2015, on Page 43560 in Number 140 of Volume 80 of the Federal Register, a person that does not market or extend those transactions to covered borrowers shall not be in violation of this section. For purposes of this section, a covered borrower has the same meaning as provided for in Part 232 (commencing with Section 232.1) of Subchapter M of Chapter I of Subtitle A of Title 32 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended on the date described in this subdivision.

(g) A person violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor. In addition, a person violating any of the provisions of this section shall be liable for actual damages and reasonable attorney’s fees incurred by the injured party.

(h) The remedies provided for in this section are not intended to be exclusive but are in addition to the remedies provided for in other laws, including Sections 51 and 52 of the Civil Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 97, Sec. 21.   (AB 2193)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

394.5.

Any employee of any corporation, company, or firm, or other person, who is a member of the reserve corps of the armed forces of the United States or of the National Guard or the Naval Militia shall be entitled to a temporary leave of absence without pay while engaged in military duty ordered for purposes of military training, drills, encampment, naval cruises, special exercises or like activity as such member, providing that the period of ordered duty does not exceed 17 calendar days annually including time involved in going to and returning from such duty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 469.)
-------------------------------------------

395.

(a) Any public employee who is a member of the reserve corps of the Armed Forces of the United States or of the National Guard or the Naval Militia is entitled to a temporary military leave of absence as provided by federal law while engaged in military duty ordered for purposes of active military training, inactive duty training, encampment, naval cruises, special exercises, or like activity, providing that the period of ordered duty does not exceed 180 calendar days, including time involved in going to and returning from that duty.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a local public agency may, but is not required to, provide paid military leave of
 absence for periods of inactive duty training.

(c) The employee has an absolute right to be restored to the former office or position and status formerly had by them in the same locality and in the same office, board, commission, agency, or institution of the public agency upon the termination of temporary military duty. If the office or position has been abolished or otherwise has ceased to exist during their absence, the employee shall be reinstated to a position of like seniority, status, and pay if a position exists, or if no position exists the employee shall have the same rights and privileges that they would have had if they had occupied the position when it ceased to exist and had not taken temporary military leave of absence.

(d) Any public employee who has been
 in the service of the public agency from which the leave is taken for a period of not less than one year immediately prior to the date upon which a
 temporary military leave of absence begins, shall receive the same vacation, sick leave, and holiday privileges and the same rights and privileges to promotion, continuance in office, employment, reappointment to office, or reemployment that the employee would have enjoyed had they not been absent, except that an uncompleted probationary period, if any, in the public agency, shall be completed upon
 reinstatement as provided by law or rule of the agency. For the purposes of this section, in determining the one year of service in a public agency, all service of the employee in recognized military service shall be counted as public agency service.

(e) If this section is in conflict with a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the memorandum of understanding requires the expenditure of funds, it shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 32.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

395.01.

(a) Any public employee who is on temporary military leave of absence for military duty ordered for purposes of active military training, inactive duty training, encampment, naval cruises, special exercises, or like activity as such member, provided that the period of ordered duty does not exceed 180 calendar days including time involved in going to and returning from the duty, and who has been in the service of the public agency from which the leave is taken for a period of not less than one year immediately prior to the day on which the absence begins, is entitled to receive their salary or compensation as a public employee for the first 30 calendar days of the absence. Pay for those purposes may not
 exceed 30 days in any one fiscal year. For the purposes of this section, in determining the one year of public agency service, all service of a public employee in the recognized military service shall be counted as public agency service.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a local public agency may, but is not required to, pay an employee during a period of inactive duty training.

(c) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4, of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if those provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of
 funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 129, Sec. 33.   (SB 1097)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

395.02.

Every officer and employee of a public agency who is on military leave other than temporary military leave of absence who has been in the service of such public agency for a period of not less than one year immediately prior to the date on which the absence begins shall be entitled to receive his salary or compensation as such officer or employee for the first 30 calendar days while engaged in the performance of ordered military duty.

As used in this section only, the terms “officer” and “employee” mean an officer or employee who

(a) Is ordered into active military duty as a member of a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States;

(b) Is ordered into active federal military duty as a member of the National Guard or Naval Militia; or

(c) Is inducted, enlists, enters or is otherwise ordered or called into active duty as a member of the armed forces of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1561.)
-------------------------------------------

395.03.

No more than the pay for a period of 30 calendar days shall be allowed under the provisions of Section 395.01 or 395.02 for any one military leave of absence or during any one fiscal year, except as otherwise authorized by resolution of the legislative body of a public agency or as provided in a memorandum of understanding reached with an employee organization pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 928, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

395.04.

During the time that as an officer or enlisted person of the California National Guard, who is on full-time active duty in the military service of the state, and is engaged, with the approval of the Adjutant General, in the military service of the state in attendance at drills, camps, or special exercises, sponsored by federal authority or by the United States Department of Defense, as a member of the National Guard of the United States, he or she shall receive salary, pay, and compensation as provided in Sections 320 and 321.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 118, Sec. 35.   (SB 1501)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

395.05.

(a) Any public employee who is a member of the National Guard, shall be entitled to absent himself from his duties or service, without regard to the length of his public service, while engaged in the performance of ordered military or naval duty and while going to and returning from such duty, provided such duty is performed during such time as the Governor may have issued a proclamation of a state of extreme emergency or during such time as the National Guard may be on active duty in one or more of the situations described or included in Section 146 of this code provided such absence does not exceed the duration of such emergency. During the absence of such officer or employee while engaged in such military service during such emergency and while going to and returning from such duty, and for a period not to exceed 30 calendar days, he shall receive his salary or compensation as such officer or employee and shall not be subjected by any person directly or indirectly by reason of such absence to any loss or diminution of vacation or holiday privilege or be prejudiced by reason of such absence with reference to promotion or continuance in office, employment, reappointment to office, or reemployment.
